Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.614

Female genital mutilation—Education program.

(1) The department must establish an education program for the prevention of female genital mutilation. The program must be designed to provide information about the health risks and emotional trauma inflicted by the practice of female genital mutilation, as well as the civil and criminal penalties for committing female genital mutilation.

(2) The department must develop policies and procedures to promote partnerships with relevant stakeholders to prevent female genital mutilation and to protect and provide assistance to victims of female genital mutilation, including partnerships with:

(a) Relevant state agencies that provide services to persons at risk of female genital mutilation or persons who have been subjected to female genital mutilation;

(b) The department of children, youth, and families;

(c) The Washington state patrol;

(d) The attorney general; and

(e) Other government entities and nongovernmental organizations.

(3) The department must make recommendations and develop procedures regarding strategies and methodologies for training health care providers as defined in RCW 70.02.010 on recognizing the risk factors associated with female genital mutilation and the signs that a person may be a victim of female genital mutilation.

(4) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department may contract with nongovernmental organizations, entities, or persons with experience working with victims of female genital mutilation to provide training and materials and other services as the department deems necessary.

(5) The department may adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

(6) For purposes of this section, "female genital mutilation" has the meaning provided in RCW 18.130.460.

[ 2023 c 122 s 6.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Effective date—2023 c 122: See notes following RCW 9A.36.170.